Illinois, session 104th, HB57.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Essential Support Person Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 175/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Department" means the Department of Public Health or, 9with respect to community-integrated living arrangements, as 10defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 11Licensure and Certification Act, the Department of Human 12Services.13    "Essential support" means support that includes, but is 14not limited to:15        (1) assistance with activities of daily living; and16        (2) physical, emotional, psychological, and 17    socialization support for the resident.18    "Facility" means any of the following: a facility as 19defined in Section 10 of the Alzheimer's Disease and Related 20Dementias Special Care Disclosure Act; an assisted living 21establishment or shared housing establishment as defined in 22Section 10 of the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act; a 23Community Living Facility as defined in Section 3 of the   HB0057 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03872 BAB 13896 b1Community Living Facilities Licensing Act; a facility as 2defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities Act; a 3continuum of care facility as defined in Section 10 of the 4Continuum of Care Services for the Developmentally Disabled 5Act; a facility as defined in Section 1-113 of the Nursing Home 6Care Act; a MC/DD facility as defined in Section 1-113 of the 7MC/DD Act; an ID/DD facility as defined in Section 1-113 of the 8ID/DD Community Care Act; a hospice program as defined in 9Section 3 of the Hospice Program Licensing Act; a Supportive 10Residence as defined in Section 10 of the Supportive 11Residences Licensing Act; a facility as defined in Section 121-102 of the Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 132013; a home, institution, or other place operated by or under 14the authority of the Department of Veterans' Affairs; an 15Alzheimer's disease management center alternative health care 16model under the Alternative Health Care Delivery Act; and a 17home, institution, or other place that is a State-operated 18mental health or developmental disability center or facility. 19"Facility" does not include a hospital as defined in the 20Hospital Licensing Act or any hospital authorized under the 21University of Illinois Hospital Act. "Facility" does not 22include any facility that the Department of Public Health or 23the Department of Veterans' Affairs does not regulate.24    "Home" means a community-integrated living arrangement as 25defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 26Licensure and Certification Act.   HB0057 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03872 BAB 13896 b1    "Office" means the Office of State Long Term Care 2Ombudsman.3    "Person-centered care plan" means a care plan for a 4resident developed by the resident or resident's 5representative in consultation with health professionals that 6focuses on the resident's physical, emotional, psychological, 7and socialization needs and describes the resident's right to 8designate a primary essential support person or secondary 9essential support person.10    "Primary essential support person" means a person 11designated by a resident, or the resident's representative, 12who has access to the resident in accordance with rules set by 13the Department to provide essential support according to the 14resident's person-centered care plan.15    "Resident" means a person who is living in a facility or 16home or is seeking admission to a facility or home. "Resident" 17includes a guardian of the person or an agent for the person 18under a power of attorney.19    "Secondary essential support person" means a person 20designated by the resident, or the resident's representative, 21to serve as a backup to a primary essential support person.22(Source: P.A. 103-261, eff. 6-30-23.)